Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5273.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 221 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out section 70A and inserting in place thereof the following
section:-
Section 70A. Court officers and those authorized to act as court officers within the
judicial branch may perform police duties and have police powers in or about the premises of the
court or in the immediate vicinity thereof when so designated by the chief justice of the trial
court, the chief justice of the supreme judicial court or the chief justice of the appeals court, as
appropriate. Pursuant to said police powers, court officers may carry within the premises of the
court or in the immediate vicinity thereof such weapons as the chief justice of the trial court, the
chief justice of the supreme judicial court or the chief justice of the appeals court shall determine
necessary. Provided, however, that, prior to being permitted to carry a firearm within a
courthouse, a court officer shall have a license to carry pursuant to section 131 or section 131F of
chapter 140.
of 1